Arkansas, session 2025, HB1103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Corrections - Division of Community Correction for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U084U DCC DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) N129N DCC DEPUTY DIR PAROLE/PROBATION SERV 1 GRADE GS14
(3) N114N DCC DEPUTY DIR RESIDENTIAL SVCS 1 GRADE GS14
(4) T005C DOC CORRECTIONAL WARDEN 6 GRADE GS12
*DJC004*
01/13/2025 9:46:49 AM DJC004

HB1103
(5) T004C DCC PROGRAM ADMR PAROLE & PROBATION SVCS 5 GRADE GS11
(6) M001C DCC TREATMENT ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS11
(7) T033C DOC MAJOR 3 GRADE GS11
(8) X025C DCC PAROLE/PROBATION AREA MANAGER 18 GRADE GS10
(9) T048C DOC CAPTAIN 4 GRADE GS10
(10) T015C DOC DEPUTY WARDEN 4 GRADE GS10
(11) T054C DOC LIEUTENANT 33 GRADE GS09
(12) S094C ADC CONSTRUCTION/MAINTENANCE COORD 2 GRADE GS08
(13) M007C DCC ASST TREATMENT PROGRAM MGR 7 GRADE GS08
(14) X042C DCC PAROLE/PROBATION ASST AREA MGR 47 GRADE GS08
(15) M021C DCC TREATMENT SUPERVISOR 7 GRADE GS08
(16) T065C DOC CORRECTIONAL SERGEANT 67 GRADE GS08
(17) T045C DCC PAROLE/PROBATION OFFICER 549 GRADE GS07
(18) G154C DCC PROGRAM COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS07
(19) T075C DOC CORPORAL 295 GRADE GS07
(20) T059C DOC FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER 11 GRADE GS07
(21) M046C DOC TREATMENT COORDINATOR 18 GRADE GS07
(22) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(23) A063C RESEARCH & STATISTICS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(24) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 6 GRADE GS06
(25) M057C CHAPLAIN 6 GRADE GS06
(26) T083C DOC CORRECTIONAL OFFICER I 1 GRADE GS06
(27) T070C DOC FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR 19 GRADE GS06
(28) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(29) M048C SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM LEADER 58 GRADE GS06
(30) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 7 GRADE GS05
(31) G215C CAREER PLANNING & PLACEMENT SPECIALIST 14 GRADE GS05
(32) G200C CLASSIFICATION & ASSIGNMENT OFFICER 4 GRADE GS05
(33) X128C CORRECTIONAL UNIT ACCREDITATION SPEC 1 GRADE GS05
(34) T092C DCC PAROLE/PROBATION OFFICER I 1 GRADE GS05
(35) T076C DOC ADMIN REVIEW OFFICER 7 GRADE GS05
(36) M059C DOC ADVISOR 134 GRADE GS05
(37) S026C DOC ASST MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 9 GRADE GS05
(38) M058C DOC PROGRAM SPECIALIST 10 GRADE GS05
(39) C024C DOC RECORDS SUPERVISOR 8 GRADE GS05
(40) R031C INSTITUTION HUMAN RESOURCES COORD 6 GRADE GS05
01/13/2025 9:46:49 AM DJC004

HB1103
(41) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 91 GRADE GS04
(42) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS04
(43) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 64 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1,538

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Corrections - Division of Community Correction for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: ten (10) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of
pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the
Division of Community Correction Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Corrections - Division of Community
Correction - State Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $74,004,853
(02) EXTRA HELP 100,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 29,688,116
(04) OVERTIME 210,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 13,710,795
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 32,880
(C) PROF. FEES 168,729
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) REENTRY 5,285,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $123,200,373

01/13/2025 9:46:49 AM DJC004

HB1103
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - SPECIAL REVENUE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the
Community Correction Revolving Fund, for operating expenses of the Department
of Corrections - Division of Community Correction - Operations - Special
Revenue for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $12,062,870
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 100,000
(C) PROF. FEES 1,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,700,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $14,862,870

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - RESIDENTS SERVICES - CASH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Corrections
- Division of Community Correction - Residents Services - Cash for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $2,557,846
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 101,800
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,659,646

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL ASSET FORFEITURE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
01/13/2025 9:46:49 AM DJC004

HB1103
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Corrections
- Division of Community Correction - Federal Asset Forfeiture for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ASSET FORFEITURE $75,000

SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROVISION. Upon seeking and receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State and review and approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee, the Director of the Department of Corrections -
Division of Community Correction is authorized to transfer appropriation from
any line item authorized in the State Operations and Operations - Special
Revenue Appropriations of this Act to any other line item authorized in the
State Operations and Operations - Special Revenue Appropriations of this Act.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Department of Corrections - Division of Community
Correction may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to
the Department of Corrections - Division of Community Correction authorizing
broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and
appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior
approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by
this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the
requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire
section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.
01/13/2025 9:46:49 AM DJC004

HB1103

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. MOTOR
VEHICLE PURCHASE PROVISION. The Department of Corrections - Division of
Community Correction is hereby authorized to purchase motor vehicles from the
appropriations authorized for Capital Outlay in the State Operations and
Special Revenue Operations appropriations in this Act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 9. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 10. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 11. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
01/13/2025 9:46:49 AM DJC004

HB1103
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.
































01/13/2025 9:46:49 AM DJC004